District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.14

Rules; enforcement.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter within one year of February 26, 2015.

(b)

Rules and standards adopted pursuant to any act repealed or superseded by this chapter shall remain in effect unless replaced or repealed by rules and standards promulgated in accordance with this chapter.

(c)

The Mayor may establish civil penalties or fines to enforce the provisions of this chapter and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

(d)

The Mayor may require a private collection property owner found in violation of § 8-1031.04 more than once in a period of 6 months to submit a source separation plan.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 114, 61 DCR 9971